en: Bircher-style muesli flakes with fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Bircher-style muesli flakes with dried fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli floconneux aux fruits enrichi en vitamines et minéraux, Muesli floconneux aux fruits secs enrichi en vitamines et minéraux

en: Bircher-style sugar free muesli flakes with fruits, Bircher-style sugar free Muesli flakes with dried fruits
fr: Muesli floconneux aux fruits sans sucres ajoutés, Muesli floconneux aux fruits secs sans sucres ajoutés

en: Muesli flakes fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Muesli pahuljice obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Musli dribsniai papildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Muesli flakes not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Muesli pahuljice koje nisu obogaćene vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Musli dribsniai nepapildyti vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Mueslis with chocolate
de: Müslis mit Schokolade, Schokomüslis
es: Mueslis con chocolate
fi: myslit suklaalla
fr: Mueslis au chocolat
hr: Musli s čokoladom
it: Muesli con cioccolato
lt: Muslis su šokoladu
nl: Muesli met chocola
pl: Musli czekoladowe, musli z czekoladą
pt: Mueslis com chocolate
ro: Müsli cu ciocolată

en: Bircher-style mueslis with chocolate
fr: Mueslis floconneux au chocolat

en: Crunchy mueslis
fr: Mueslis croustillants
hr: Hrskavi musli
lt: Traškus muslis

en: Crunchy mueslis without fruits
fr: Mueslis croustillants sans fruits

en: Crunchy mueslis with fruits, Crunchy muesli with fruits
fr: Mueslis croustillants aux fruits, Muesli croustillant aux fruits
hr: Hrskavi müsli s voćem
lt: Traškus muslis su vaisiais

en: Crunchy muesli with fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Crunchy muesli with dried fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli croustillant aux fruits enrichi en vitamines et minéraux, Muesli croustillant aux fruits secs enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Hrskavi müsli s voćem obogaćeni vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Traškus muslis su vaisiais papildytas vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Crunchy muesli with fruits not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements, Crunchy Muesli with fruits dried fruits grains not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli croustillant aux fruits non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux, Muesli croustillant aux fruits secs et aux graines non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Hrskavi müsli s voćem koji nije obogaćen vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Traškus muslis su vaisiais nepapildytas vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Crunchy mueslis with chocolate
fr: Mueslis croustillant au chocolat
hr: Hrskavi müsli s čokoladom
lt: Traškus muslis su šokoladu

en: Crunchy chocolate muesli fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli croustillant au chocolat enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Hrskavi čokoladni müsli obogaćen vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Traškus muslis su šokoladu papildytas vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Crunchy muesli with chocolate not fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Muesli croustillant au chocolat non enrichi en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Hrskavi müsli s čokoladom koji nisu obogaćeni vitaminima i kemijskim elementima
lt: Traškus muslis su šokoladu nepapildytas vitaminais ir mineralais

en: Cereal flakes, Rolled cereals
ca: Flocs de cereals, cereals laminats
de: Frühstücksflocken
es: Copos de cereales
fi: viljahiutaleet
fr: Flocons de céréales
hr: Žitne pahuljice
hu: Gabonapelyhek
it: Fiocchi di cereali
lt: Javų dribsniai
nl: Ontbijtvlokken
pt: Flocos de cereais

en: Amaranth flakes
de: Amaranthflocken
es: Copos de amaranto
fr: Flocons d'amarante
hr: Pahuljice amaranta
lt: Amarantų dribsniai
nl: Amarantvlokken

en: Barley flakes
de: Gerstenflocken
es: Copos de cebada
fr: Flocons d’orge
hr: Ječmene pahuljice
lt: Miežių dribsniai
nl: Gerstevlokken

en: Buckwheat flakes
de: Buchweizenflocken
es: Copos de trigo sarraceno
fr: Flocons de sarrasin
hr: Pahuljice od heljde
lt: Grikių dribsniai
nl: Boekweitvlokken
ro: Fulgi de hrișcă

en: Corn flakes, Corn-Flakes
cs: Kukuřičné lupínky
de: Cornflakes
es: Copos de maíz tostado
fi: maissihiutaleet
fr: Corn-flakes, pétales de maïs, Corn flakes
hr: Kukuruzne pahuljice
it: Cornflakes
ja: コーンフレーク
lt: Kukurūzų dribsniai
nl: Cornflakes
pl: Płatki kukurydziane
pt: Flocos de milho
ru: Кукурузные хлопья

en: Plain corn flakes
fr: Corn flakes natures, Pétales de maïs natures, Corn flakes non sucrés, Pétales de maïs non sucrées
hr: Obične kukuruzne pahuljice
lt: Paprasti kukurūzų dribsniai